Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201257-1413
Documents or records; not withheld
from public.

The
commission shall not withhold any documents or records relating to a major
oil pipeline from the public unless the documents or records are of the type
that can be withheld under section 84-712.05 or unless federal law provides
otherwise.

Laws 2012, LB1161, § 3.
April 18, 2012